Arkansas, session 2025, SB461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 25, is amended to read as
follows:
Chapter 25
Public Hearing Prior to Location of Community-Based Residential Facilities
General Provisions

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 25, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
12-25-102. Punitive segregation report — Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(1) “Segregation” means any type of detention, whether voluntary
or involuntary, that involves:
(A) The removal of a person from the general inmate
population;
(B) A restriction of access to a program or service
provided by the correctional facility;
*CEB157*
03/13/2025 8:34:49 PM CEB157

SB461
(C) A restriction or prohibition of interaction with other
incarcerated people;
(D) A loss of out-of-cell time or other condition of
confinement; or
(E) Involves being placed in a locked room or cell for
seventeen (17) hours or more in a twenty-four (24) hour period;
(2) "Serious mental illness" means one of the following
disorders as classified in the American Psychiatric Association's
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders as it existed on
January 1, 2025:
(A) A disorder categorized under the schizophrenia
spectrum and other psychotic disorders;
(B) Bipolar disorder;
(C) Major depressive disorder;
(D) Delusional disorder;
(E) Post-traumatic stress disorder; and
(F) Traumatic brain injury; and
(3) "Suicide" means the act of taking one's own life voluntarily
and intentionally.
(b) The Department of Corrections, the Division of Youth Services, and
all local and regional detention facilities shall submit a quarterly report
to the Legislative Council that includes:
(1) The number of persons disciplined with, held in, or
transferred to segregation during the prior quarter, including the following
information concerning those persons:
(A) Racial composition;
(B) Gender;
(C) The number of persons:
(i) That are in protective custody;
(ii) Who are twenty-one (21) years of age or
younger;
(iii) Who are fifty-five (55) years of age or older;
(iv) With a serious mental illness;
(v) That are pregnant or were pregnant within the
previous twelve (12) weeks;
(vi) With a disability, broken down by type of
03/13/2025 8:34:49 PM CEB157

SB461
disability; and
(vii) With a medical condition, categorized by type
of condition;
(D) The number of:
(i) Suicides;
(ii) Attempted suicides by persons housed in
segregation;
(iii) Incidents of self-harm by persons housed in
segregation; and
(iv) Persons who died while in segregation, broken
down by cause of death;
(E) The number of persons in segregation currently who
have already been in segregation for:
(i) Less than one (1) day but not more than fifteen
(15) days;
(ii) At least (16) days, but not more than thirty
(30) days;
(iii) At least thirty-one (31) days, but not more
than ninety (90) days;
(iv) At least ninety-one (91) days, but not more
than one hundred eighty (180) days;
(v) At least one hundred eighty-one (181) days, but
not more than one (1) year;
(vi) At least one (1) year and one (1) day, but not
more than three (3) years;
(vii) At least three (3) years and (1) day, but not
more than six (6) years; and
(viii) Six (6) years and one (1) day or more; and
(F) The number of persons who are or have been sentenced
to or otherwise scheduled to be in segregation for a total of:
(i) Less than one (1) day but not more than fifteen
(15) days;
(ii) At least (16) days, but not more than thirty
(30) days;
(iii) At least thirty-one (31) days, but not more
than ninety (90) days;
03/13/2025 8:34:49 PM CEB157

SB461
(iv) At least ninety-one (91) days, but not more
than one hundred eighty (180) days;
(v) At least one hundred eighty-one (181) days, but
not more than one (1) year;
(vi) At least one (1) year and one (1) day, but not
more than three (3) years;
(vii) At least three (3) years and (1) day, but not
more than six (6) years; and
(viii) Six (6) years and one (1) day or more;
(2) The number of times segregation has been used as a sanction,
punishment, or disciplinary action during the prior quarter, including
extensions of segregation;
(3) The total number of sanctions, punishments, or disciplinary
actions taken other than segregation during the prior quarter, including
without limitation:
(A) Loss of any privilege;
(B) Loss of or reduction in classification;
(C) Loss of or demotion in a job or position at the
division; and
(D) Restitution;
(4) The number of persons disciplined with, held in, or
transferred to segregation during the prior quarter due to:
(A) One (1) or more disciplinary infraction;
(B) Administrative reasons;
(C) Protective custody; or
(D) Other reasons to be listed in the report by type; and
(5) Of the persons disciplined with, held in, or transferred to
segregation during the prior quarter due to one (1) or more disciplinary
infraction as described in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section, the type of
disciplinary infraction, including without limitation:
(A) Violence to self;
(B) Violence to another;
(C) Possession of drug-related contraband;
(D) Masturbation or indecent exposure;
(E) Sex with another person;
(F) Failure to obey an order of a staff member;
03/13/2025 8:34:49 PM CEB157

SB461
(G) Refusing a direct verbal order;
(H) Threating another verbally or in writing;
(I) Insolence to a staff member;
(J) Battery or use of force on an inmate;
(K) Creating unnecessary noise;
(L) Out of place of assignment;
(M) Refusal to submit to testing;
(N) Possession or use of controlled substances, alcohol,
or chemicals;
(O) Unauthorized use of state property;
(P) Failure to keep himself or herself or his or her
quarters within regulation;
(Q) Possession, introduction, or use of a cell phone;
(R) Possession or introduction of fireworks;
(S) Unexcused absence from a work or learning assignment;
(T) Banding together or demonstration;
(U) Provoking or agitating a fight;
(V) Possession or introduction of unauthorized clothing;
(W) Lying to a staff member;
(X) Destruction of property;
(Y) Battery or use of force on staff;
(Z) Throwing or ejecting of bodily fluids or excrement;
(AA) Purchase of unauthorized articles; or
(BB) Other disciplinary infractions not listed under this
subdivision (b)(5), broken down by type of disciplinary infraction.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary Language.
The initial report required under § 12-25-102 shall be completed by
October 1, 2025.







03/13/2025 8:34:49 PM CEB157